Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.115

Petition after appointment for instruction or ratification.

(1) A guardian or conservator may petition the court for instruction concerning fiduciary responsibility or ratification of a particular act related to the guardianship or conservatorship.

(2) Fourteen days after notice of a petition under subsection (1) of this section, the court may give an instruction and issue an appropriate order.

(3) The petitioner must provide reasonable notice of the petition and hearing to the individual subject to a guardianship or conservatorship and any notice party.

[ 2020 c 312 s 306; 2019 c 437 s 123.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.